Tennessee, session 114, SB0271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-313, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) It is unlawful for a person to act as a professional bondsman, directly or
indirectly, while:
(1) Serving as a constitutionally elected peace officer, or as such officer's
deputy, or any duly elected or appointed county official; or
(2) Owning, operating, or being an employee of a qualified contract
service provider, as defined in § 40-11-152(a).
(b) Subdivision (a)(1) does not apply to any duly elected member of the county
legislative body.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0271
001785
- 1 -